District of Columbia statutes.
16-1312

Juries for condemnation proceedings.

For purposes of this subchapter, a special jury list shall be prepared of not less than one hundred persons who are qualified jurors in the District of Columbia. When a jury is required for a condemnation proceeding under this subchapter, the names of such number of persons as may be necessary shall be selected from this list by lot and furnished to the Superior Court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Mar. 27, 1968, 82 Stat. 63, Pub. L. 90-274, § 103(d)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 558, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 145(f)(4)
This section is referenced in § 16-1313 and § 16-1357.
1981 Ed., § 16-1312.
1973 Ed., § 16-1312.